Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,135
Class V school district; sale of site; sheriff; disbursement of proceeds; disposition.

If, upon the final determination of the action, the sale under sections 79-10,127 to 79-10,134 is ratified and confirmed, the court shall direct the sheriff to pay to the school district the proceeds of such sale and shall direct the board of education of such school district to place the proceeds of the sale in the fund set apart by law for the purchase of school sites and the construction of high school buildings, to be used for the purchase of a site and the construction of such school buildings and for no other purpose.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 9, p. 987;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1069;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 781.